South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5574.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-9-920(B)(12) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (12) resident antler restriction individual antlered deer tag shall be used to administer the Coyote and Hog Management Program. No later than January thirty-first of each year, the department must file with the General Assembly a report on the use of these funds during the preceding year; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----